District of Columbia statutes.
42-2008

Use of elements held in common; right to enter units for certain repairs.

(a)

Each co-owner may use the elements held in common in accordance with the purposes for which they are intended, without hindering or encroaching upon the lawful rights of the other co-owners.

(b)

The manager, board of directors or of administration, as the case may be, shall have an irrevocable right and an easement to enter units to make repairs to common elements or when repairs reasonably appear to be necessary for public safety or to prevent damage to property other than the unit.

Dec. 21, 1963, 77 Stat. 452, Pub. L. 88-218, § 8
1981 Ed., § 45-1708.
1973 Ed., § 5-908.
Supersedure of chapter: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-2001.